Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0784.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 1271. (1) The department shall establish and operate a
program to provide free school lunch and breakfast to public school
and nonpublic school pupils in grades pre-K to 12 and to pupils who
are not more than 26 years of age and are enrolled in special
education programs, including pupils who attend the Michigan School
for the Deaf.
(2) A participating entity shall apply to the department for
enrollment in the free school lunch and breakfast program
established under subsection (1) in a form and manner determined by
CRM S00444'25 (S-1) bg31df


the department. The department shall approve a participating
entity's application if the participating entity does all of the
following:
(a) Participates in the National School Lunch Program and
School Breakfast Program.
(b) Provides reimbursable breakfasts and reimbursable lunches
at no cost to all pupils for any school breakfast program or school
lunch program operated by the participating entity.
(c) Submits information regarding the number of reimbursable
breakfasts and reimbursable lunches served in a manner determined
by the department.
(d) Maximizes federal reimbursement for reimbursable
breakfasts and reimbursable lunches by operating under the CEP if
the participating entity has an identified student percentage
greater than or equal to the minimum requirement to be eligible to
participate in the CEP. For purposes of this subdivision, all
eligible participating entities must elect CEP on behalf of a
single school, a group or groups of schools, or all schools in the
participating entity, as applicable, in a manner that maximizes
federal reimbursement as determined by the department.
(e) Meets all applicable federal and state standards in its
school breakfast and lunch programs, as determined by the
department.
(f) Takes all efforts to maximize and implement policies that
encourage parents or legal guardians to fill out relevant family
income information, in a manner prescribed by the department, for
the purposes of determining student eligibility for federal free or
reduced cost meal reimbursement rates, CEP eligibility
determinations, and other educational benefits.
CRM S00444'25 (S-1) bg31df


(g) Forgives all school meal debt, as determined by the
department.
(3) Subject to federal law and regulations, participating
entities shall offer meals that meet a pupil's disability or
medical need that restricts the pupil's diet if that disability or
medical need is documented by a medical statement that conforms to
current federal regulations. Accommodations must be made on a case-
by-case basis. Participating entities are encouraged to offer meals
that meet a pupil's religious or dietary preferences, including,
but not limited to, vegetarian, kosher, and halal meals, if those
religious or dietary preferences meet the federal meal pattern
requirements.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) "CEP" means the Community Eligibility Provision under the
Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act, 42 USC 1751 to 1769j.
(b) "Participating entity" means a public school, a nonpublic
school, or the Michigan School for the Deaf.
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless Senate Bill No. 785 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into
law.
Final Page
CRM S00444'25 (S-1) bg31df